Arkansas, session 2025, SB16.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-12-804 is amended to read as follows:
23-12-804. Discharge of firearms or throwing objects at railroad or
street car.
If any person wantonly, maliciously, or mischievously knowingly
discharges firearms or throws stones, sticks, clubs, or other missiles at,
into, or against any locomotive, railroad car, or street car on any railroad,
upon conviction he or she shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. On
conviction the person shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-
five dollars ($25.00) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or by
imprisonment in the county jail for not more than three (3) months, or by
both a fine and imprisonment.
*CEB050*
12/20/2024 10:19:15 AM CEB050